Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2 ADOPTION
19-5-210. Hearing on petition.

A hearing on the petition for adoption shall be held on the date set or the date to which the matter has been regularly continued.

(1.5) Except in stepparent, second parent, custodial, or kinship adoptions, the court shall issue a certificate of approval of placement, placing the child's custodial care with prospective adoptive parents pending final hearing on the petition for adoption,
if it appears to the court that the placement for adoption is in the best interest of the child.

In stepparent, custodial, or kinship adoptions, the court shall hold a hearing on the petition as soon as possible. In all other adoptions, the court shall hold a hearing on the petition no sooner than one hundred eighty-two days after the date the child
begins to live in the prospective adoptive parent's home, unless for good cause shown that time is extended or shortened by the court. At the hearing held on the petition, the court shall enter a decree setting forth its findings
and grant to the petitioner a final decree of adoption if it is satisfied as to:

The availability of the child for adoption;

The good moral character, the ability to support and educate the child, and the suitableness of the home of the person adopting such child;

The fingerprint-based criminal history record checks of the prospective adoptive parent as reported to the court by the county department of human or social services or the child placement agency pursuant to section 19-5-207 (2.5) or the information provided
to the court pursuant to section 19-5-208 (5) does not reveal a criminal history described in section 19-5-207 (2.5)(a);

The mental and physical condition of the child as a proper subject for adoption in said home;

The fact that the best interests of the child will be served by the adoption; and

If the child is part of a sibling group, whether it is in the best interests of the child to remain in an intact sibling group. If the county department or child placement agency locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement
for all of the children in the sibling group, it shall be presumed that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance
of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children. The judge shall review the family services plan document regarding placement
of siblings.

The former name of the child shall not be stated in the final decree of adoption.

If, after the hearing, the court is not satisfied as to the matters listed in subsection (2) of this section, the petition for adoption may be either continued or dismissed in the discretion of the court. The court shall not grant the decree of final
adoption if it determines that the prospective adoptive parent was convicted at any time by a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony in one of the following areas: Child abuse or neglect; spousal abuse; any crime against a
child; or any crime involving violence, rape, sexual assault, or homicide, excluding other physical assault or battery. For stepparent, kinship, or custodial adoptions, in addition to not granting a decree of final adoption in
circumstances involving the felony convictions listed in this subsection (4), the court shall not grant the decree of final adoption if it determines that the prospective adoptive parent was convicted of a felony for physical assault
or battery that was committed within the past five years.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), all hearings with reference to adoption shall be closed to the public and, in the discretion of the court, to any child who is the subject of adoption and who is under twelve years
of age, but the court may interview the child whenever it deems it proper.

Upon motion by any party to an adoption or upon the court's own motion, the court may order that an adoption hearing be opened to the public or to the child who is, or the children who are, the subject of the adoption if the court finds that opening the
hearing is in the best interests of the child who is, or the children who are, the subject of the adoption hearing and the court finds that the potential adoptive parents have consented to an open hearing.

In a stepparent adoption, in addition to issuing a final decree of adoption, the court shall enter an order terminating the other parent's parental rights. In a custodial or kinship adoption, in addition to issuing a final decree of adoption, the court
shall enter an order terminating the parental rights of the child's parents.

In cases involving the adoption of a child who is part of a sibling group, but who is not being adopted with his or her siblings, in addition to issuing a final decree of adoption, if the adoptive parents are willing, the court may encourage reasonable
visitation among the siblings when visitation is in the best interests of the child or the children. The court shall review the record and inquire as to whether the adoptive parents have received counseling regarding children in
sibling groups maintaining or developing ties with each other.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 809, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
IP(2) amended, p. 1165, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(2) and (4) amended, p. 1423, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 99:
Entire section amended, p. 1064, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2000:
(2) amended and (7) added, p. 478, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2)(e) amended, p. 2628, § 11, effective June 5.

L. 2005:
IP(2) and (5) amended, p. 94, § 4, effective March 31.

L. 2007:
(1.5) amended, p. 838, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2012:
IP(2) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 880, § 142, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(2)(b.5) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 432, § 76, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-4-112 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-211. Legal effects of final decree.

After the entry of a final decree of adoption, the person adopted is, for all intents and purposes, the child of the petitioner. He or she is entitled to all the rights and privileges and is subject to all the obligations of a child born to the petitioner.

(1.5) An employer who permits paternity or maternity time off for biological parents following the birth of a child shall, upon request, make such time off available for individuals adopting a child. If the employer has established a policy providing
time off for biological parents, that period of time shall be the minimum period of leave available for adoptive parents. Requests for additional leave due to the adoption of an ill child or a child with a disability shall
be considered on the same basis as comparable cases of such complications accompanying the birth of such a child to an employee or employee's spouse. Any other benefits provided by the employer, such as job guarantee or pay,
shall be available to both adoptive and biological parents on an equal basis. An employer shall not penalize an employee for exercising the rights provided by this subsection (1.5). The provisions of this subsection (1.5) shall
not apply to an adoption by the spouse of a custodial parent or to a second-parent adoption.

The parents shall be divested of all legal rights and obligations with respect to the child, and the adopted child shall be free from all legal obligations of obedience and maintenance with respect to the parents.

(2.5) The child shall be eligible for enrollment and coverage by any medical or dental insurance held by the prospective adoptive parents if, and on such a basis as, such coverage would be available to a child naturally born to the prospective adoptive
parents.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed to divest any natural parent or child of any legal right or obligation where the adopting parent is a stepparent and is married to said natural parent.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 810, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 88:
(1.5) added, p. 759, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 93:
(1.5) amended, p. 1638, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(2.5) added, p. 1165, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(2) amended, p. 1065, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 2007:
(1.5) amended, p. 838, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2018:
(1) amended, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 754, § 12, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-4-113 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-212. Copies of order of adoption - to whom given.

If the court enters an order of adoption, certified copies shall be given to the adopting parents, the person or agency consenting to the adoption, and the state registrar.

The court or the adopting parents or their legal representative shall send to the state registrar an application for a birth certificate, signed by the adoptive parents. The state registrar shall thereupon issue a new birth certificate to the child, as
provided in section 25-2-113, C.R.S.

If the child was born outside of Colorado, copies of the order of adoption and application for birth certificate shall be sent to the state registrar of the state of birth and to the registrar of vital statistics in this state. If the application for
a birth certificate is denied by the state registrar in the state of birth, the adopting parents may return to the registrar in this state and apply to him to issue a new certificate of birth. The state registrar shall issue a
birth certificate upon satisfactory evidence that the adopting parents, after good-faith effort, were unable to obtain a new certificate of birth from the state of birth.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 810, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-114 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-213. Compensation for placing child prohibited.

No person shall offer, give, charge, or receive any money or other consideration or thing of value in connection with the relinquishment and adoption, except attorney fees and such other charges and fees as may be approved by the court.

No person, other than an adoption exchange whose membership includes county departments and child placement agencies, a licensed child placement agency, or a county department, shall offer, give, charge, or receive any money or other consideration or
thing of value in connection with locating or identifying for purposes of adoption any child, natural parent, expectant natural parent, or prospective adoptive parent; except that physicians and attorneys may charge reasonable
fees for professional services customarily performed by such persons.

A child who is placed by a county department in a foster care home operated by a child placement agency shall be deemed, for purposes of payment to the child placement agency, to remain in foster care status for purposes of payment of consideration to
the child placement agency until the date that the final decree of adoption is entered or until the date that the child is returned to his or her biological parent's home, unless otherwise negotiated in the contract between
the child placement agency and the county department.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 811, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2005:
(1) amended, p. 970, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 2021:
(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3221, § 391, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-115 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-213.5. Unauthorized advertising for adoption purposes - exceptions - penalty - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advertise through a public medium" means to communicate by any public medium, including by newspaper, periodical, telephone book listing, outdoor advertising sign, radio, or television or by computerized communication system, which includes an internet
site, an internet profile, or any similar medium of communication provided via the internet. "Advertising through a public medium" does not include communicating through personal or work electronic mail, text, or telephone.

"Another jurisdiction" means the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, an Indian tribe, or a state of the United States other than Colorado.

"Child" means a person less than eighteen years of age.

Except as described in subsection (3) of this section, it is unlawful to advertise through a public medium for one of the following purposes:

To find a child to adopt or to otherwise take permanent physical custody of a child;

To find an adoptive home or any other permanent physical placement for a child or to arrange for or assist in the adoption, adoptive placement, or any other permanent physical placement of a child; or

To offer to place a child for adoption or in any other permanent physical placement with another person.

Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to:

An employee of the state department of human services, a county department of human or social services, or a child placement agency that is licensed pursuant to part 9 of article 6 of title 26 who is acting within the scope of the employee's employment
to place a child for adoption or in foster care;

An individual or agency that provides adoption information through the statewide adoption resource registry as provided in section 26-1-111 (4), C.R.S.;

An adoption exchange whose membership includes county departments and licensed child placement agencies that provide information and referral services to find adoptive homes and to promote adoption;

An individual who contacts and has entered into an agreement with or is actively working with any of the agencies or entities described in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection (3) to place his or her child for adoption;

A person who advertises fertility-related services;

An individual who has received a favorable recommendation regarding his or her fitness to be an adoptive parent in this state from the state department of human services, a county department of human or social services, or a child placement agency licensed
in this state or in another jurisdiction from an entity authorized by that jurisdiction to conduct studies of potential adoptive homes; or

An attorney who is licensed to practice in Colorado who advertises his or her availability to practice or provide services relating to the adoption of children.

Unauthorized advertising of a child, as described in subsection (2) of this section, is a class 6 felony.

Source:

L. 2014:
Entire section added, (HB 14-1372), ch. 262, p. 1053, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(3)(a) and (3)(f) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 433, § 77, effective August 8.

L. 2022:
(3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 837, § 44, effective July 1.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-214. Limitation on annulment of adoption - best interests standard.

No final decree of adoption shall be attacked by reason of any jurisdictional or procedural defect after the expiration of ninety-one days following the entry of the final decree; except that, in cases of stepparent adoption, no final decree of adoption
shall be attacked by reason of fraud upon the court or fraud upon a party, whether or not there is a jurisdictional or procedural defect, after the expiration of one year following the entry of the final decree of adoption.

When a final decree of adoption is attacked on any basis at any time, the court shall consider the best interests of the child, taking into account the factors set forth in section 14-10-124, C.R.S. The court shall sustain the decree unless there is clear
and convincing evidence that the decree is not in the best interests of the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 811, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 94:
Entire section amended, p. 752, § 5, effective April 20; entire section amended, p. 1198, § 2, effective May 19.

L. 2012:
(1) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 880, § 143, effective July 1.

19-5-215. Records. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 811, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 943, § 4, effective March 27.

L. 90:
Entire section repealed, p. 1012, § 8, effective July 1.

19-5-216. Increased access for adoption - study.

The state department shall examine and evaluate the process of adoptive placements of children in the legal custody of the county departments of human or social services and identify those aspects of the process that may be improved to achieve the ultimate
goal of permanency for the greatest number of children in safe and healthy adoptive homes. In conducting this analysis, the state department should consider, but need not be limited to, the following:

The best means by which to increase county accessibility to qualified families seeking to adopt and the best means by which to achieve placement of children available for adoption with such families;

Whether further automation would be conducive to the achievement of permanency of children;

The need for centralization of information;

The benefits of additional standardization;

The resources of other interested entities or foundations that may be available to support public adoptions;

The programs and systems developed by other states to achieve maximum access and expedited permanency for children in safe and healthy adoptive homes; and

The methods used to reduce the number of disruptions in adoptive homes.

The executive director of the department is authorized to accept and expend on behalf of the state any funds, grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of implementing this section; except that no gift, grant, or donation
shall be accepted if the conditions attached thereto require the expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law.

The executive director of the department is authorized to apply for a federal waiver, if necessary, to authorize the use of federal grant moneys to implement this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 99:
Entire section added, p. 1024, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 2002:
(2) repealed, p. 882, § 20, effective August 7.

L. 2018:
IP(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 433, § 78, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-217. Enforcement or termination of post-adoption contact agreement.

If the decree of adoption contains a post-adoption contact agreement pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5), the court retains jurisdiction after the decree of adoption is entered to hear motions to enforce or terminate the contact agreement, or to enter
stipulated agreements of the parties to modify the contact agreement.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the adopted child at the time of any action for the enforcement or termination of the post-adoption contact agreement if
the court determines that consideration of the factors set forth in section 19-5-103 (9)(a) require the appointment of a guardian ad litem. In all adoptions other than those in which the child is placed by the county department,
a party or parties shall pay reasonable fees for the services of the guardian ad litem unless a party is indigent, in which case such fees shall be paid by the office of the child's representative.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the adopted child, or a counsel for youth for an adopted child twelve years of age or older, at the time of any action for the enforcement or termination of the post-adoption
contact agreement if the court determines that consideration of the factors set forth in section 19-5-103 (9)(a) require the appointment of a guardian ad litem or a counsel for youth. In all adoptions other than those in which
the child is placed by the county department, a party or parties shall pay reasonable fees for the services of the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth unless a party is indigent, in which case the office of the child's representative
shall pay the fees.

If there is a post-adoption agreement for contact established pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5), only a party to the contact agreement, even if he or she is not a party to the adoption, may file a motion to enforce or terminate the contact agreement
as set forth in this section.

Prior to filing a motion seeking the enforcement or termination of a post-adoption contact agreement established pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5), the party seeking enforcement or termination shall show that the party attempted in good faith to resolve
the disputed matters through mediation or other method of dispute resolution. This requirement is waived if the party's whereabouts are unknown and the party cannot be located despite diligent efforts to do so.

The court shall not terminate a post-adoption contact agreement established pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5) unless the moving party establishes that there has been a change in circumstances and that the contact agreement is no longer in the adopted
child's best interests. Following the adoption, the court shall presume that the adoptive parent's judgement is in the best interests of the child in any action seeking to enforce or terminate the contact agreement, and such presumption
may only be overcome by clear and convincing evidence. A post-adoption contact agreement may not limit the adoptive parent's ability to move out of state.

At any time after the entry of a post-adoption contact agreement pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5), the parties to the agreement may file with the court a signed, modified post-adoption contact agreement. The court shall not modify the terms of the initial
post-adoption contact agreement absent the consent of all parties to the agreement, but the court may enforce or terminate the agreement over the objection of a party to the agreement. An adopted child twelve years of age or older
at the time of the adoption must consent to any modification or termination of the contact agreement.

The court may consider documentary evidence and offers of proof in determining motions to enforce or terminate a post-adoption contact agreement established pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5), or may, in its discretion, hold a hearing on the motion.

The court shall not order further investigation or evaluation by any public or private agency or individual relating to a post-adoption contact agreement established pursuant to section 19-5-208 (4.5).

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3428, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2022:
(2) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 443, § 29, effective January 9, 2023.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.